Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 2. Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.

§ 51.5-130.
Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.

The supervision of the Department shall be the responsibility of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services under the direction and control of the Governor and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources. The Commissioner shall be a person of proven executive and administrative knowledge, skills, and abilities, with appropriate education and substantial experience in the field of aging and rehabilitative services. He shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with that of the Governor.

In cooperation with the Commonwealth Council on Aging, the Commissioner shall serve as the Governor’s principal advisor on aging issues and shall recommend to the Governor and the General Assembly such policies, legislation, and other actions appropriate to meet the needs of an aging society and to improve aging services in the Commonwealth. In addition, the Commissioner shall serve as Special Assistant to the Governor for Aging Policy and shall report directly to the Governor as necessary on aging policies.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 2.1-579, 22-330.4:2; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 12; 1984, c. 720; 1985, c. 421, §§ 51.01-13,

51.5-13

; 2012, cc.803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 64 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for the Aging and the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services shall be administered by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 59th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 66 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be the successor in interest to all rights, duties, or obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Department for the Aging or the Department of Rehabilitative Services abolished pursuant to the 60th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 68 provides: “That the Governor shall appoint a Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services in accordance with the provisions of the 59th enactment of this act effective July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 69 provides: “That the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services may enter into any contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of the 59th through 69th enactments of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 70 provides: “That the Governor may transfer any employee within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 59th through 68th enactments of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 59th through 68th enactments of this act.”

§ 51.5-131.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To employ such personnel, qualified by knowledge, skills, and abilities, as may be required to carry out the purposes of this chapter relating to the Department;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary for or incidental to the performance of the Department’s duties and the execution of its powers under this title, including but not limited to contracts with the United States, other states, agencies, and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source and, to these ends, to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable;

To perform all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

To develop and analyze information on the needs of older Virginians and persons with disabilities;

To establish plans, policies, and programs for the delivery of services to older Virginians and persons with disabilities for consideration by the Governor and the General Assembly. Such policies, plans, and programs for services for those who cannot benefit from vocational rehabilitation shall be prepared over time and as funds become available for such efforts;

To operate and maintain the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center and to organize, supervise, and provide other necessary services and facilities (i) to prepare persons with disabilities for useful and productive lives, including suitable employment, and (ii) to enable persons with disabilities, to the degree possible, to become self-sufficient and have a sense of well-being;

To develop criteria for the evaluation of plans and programs relative to the provision of aging services for older Virginians and persons with disabilities as required by the Older Americans Act, 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq., as amended;

To investigate the availability of funds from any source for planning, developing, and providing services to older Virginians and persons with disabilities, particularly those not capable of being gainfully employed;

To coordinate the Department’s plans, policies, programs, and services, and such programs and services required under §

51.5-123

, with those of the other state agencies providing services to persons with disabilities so as to achieve maximum utilization of available resources to meet the needs of such persons;

To compile and provide information on the availability of federal, state, regional, and local funds and services for older Virginians and persons with disabilities;

To accept, execute, and administer any trust in which the Department may have an interest, under the terms of the instruments creating the trust, subject to the approval of the Governor;

To promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the laws of the Commonwealth administered by the Department;

To work with the Department of Veterans Services and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services to establish a program for mental health and rehabilitative services for Virginia veterans and members of the Virginia National Guard and Virginia residents in the Armed Forces Reserves not in active federal service and their family members pursuant to §

2.2-2001.1

;

To promote the use of technologies to realize communication access and increase livability across the Commonwealth; and

To perform such other duties as may be required by the Governor and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 2.1-580, 22-330.4:3; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 12; 1985, c. 421, §§ 51.01-14, 51.5-14; 1989, c. 176; 1992, c. 755; 2008, cc. 584, 754; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, c. 542; 2020, c. 728.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 64 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for the Aging and the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services shall be administered by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 59th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 66 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be the successor in interest to all rights, duties, or obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Department for the Aging or the Department of Rehabilitative Services abolished pursuant to the 60th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

Acts 2016, c. 355, cl. 1 provides: “That the Commissioner of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall, together with the Director of the Department for Planning and Budget or his designee, representatives of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services’ Adult Protective Services Unit and local department of social services’ adult protective services units, law-enforcement agencies, financial institutions in the Commonwealth, and organizations representing elderly individuals and adults with disabilities, determine the cost of financial exploitation of adults in the Commonwealth and develop recommendations for improving the ability of financial institutions to identify financial exploitation of adults, the process by which financial institutions report suspected financial exploitation of adults, and interactions between financial institutions and local adult protective services units investigating reports of suspected financial exploitation of adults. The Commissioner shall develop recommendations for a plan to educate adults regarding financial exploitation, including common methods of exploitation and warning signs that exploitation may be occurring. The Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services’ Adult Protective Services Unit shall provide information about founded cases of financial exploitation of adults and any related compiled information to the Commissioner, who shall maintain the confidentiality of such information, for his review upon request. The Commissioner shall complete his work and report on his activities and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 1, 2017.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation” in subdivision 7.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 728 rewrote subdivision 8, which read: “To develop criteria for the evaluation of plans and programs relative to the provision of long-term services and supports for older Virginians and persons with disabilities.”

§ 51.5-132.
Commissioner to establish regulations regarding human research.

The Commissioner shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to effectuate the provisions of Chapter 5.1 (§

32.1-162.16

et seq.) of Title 32.1 for human research, as defined in §

32.1-162.16

, to be conducted or authorized by the Department, any area agency on aging, any sheltered workshop, any independent living center, or the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center. The regulations shall require the human research review committee, as provided in §

32.1-162.19

, to submit to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Commissioner or his designee, at least annually, a report on the human research projects reviewed and approved by the committee and shall require the committee to report any significant deviations from the proposals as approved.

History.

2003, cc. 57, 73, § 51.5-14.01; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, c. 542; 2020, c. 728.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 64 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for the Aging and the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services shall be administered by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 59th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 66 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be the successor in interest to all rights, duties, or obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Department for the Aging or the Department of Rehabilitative Services abolished pursuant to the 60th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 728 inserted “any area agency on aging” in the first sentence.

§ 51.5-133.
Cooperation with local authorities.

The Commissioner shall assist and cooperate with local authorities in the administration of this chapter. He shall encourage and direct the training of all personnel of local boards and local departments engaged in the administration of any adult services or adult protective services program within the purview of this chapter. The Commissioner shall collect and publish statistics and such other data as may be deemed of value in assisting public authorities and agencies of the Commonwealth in improving the care of older Virginians and persons with disabilities. The Commissioner shall also, in his discretion, initiate and conduct conferences designed to accomplish such ends and to further coordination of effort in this field.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.